Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-849
Relocation of boundaries between units; procedure.

(a) Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines within thirty days that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners, and contains words of conveyance between them.

(b) The association shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 25;

Laws 1984, LB 1105, § 4.